Utah statutes.
57-21-4.   Conduct and requirements excluded -- Defenses.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection 57-21-5 (4), this chapter does not:
(a)  require any person to exercise a higher degree of care toward a person
who has a disability than toward a person who does not have a disability;
(b)  relieve any person of obligations generally imposed on all persons
regardless of disability in a written lease, rental agreement, contract of
purchase or sale, mortgage, trust deed, or other financing agreement; or
(c)  prohibit any program, service, facility, or privilege intended to
habilitate, rehabilitate, or accommodate a person with a disability.
(2)  It is a defense to a complaint or action brought under this chapter that
the complainant has a disability that, in the circumstances and even with
reasonable accommodation, poses a serious threat to the health or safety of
the complainant or others.  The burden of proving this defense is upon the
respondent.
